Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.280

Moneys collected retained by commission.

All moneys collected by the commission under the provisions of this chapter shall be retained by the commission for the purpose of carrying out the purpose and provisions of this chapter. The commission may accept and retain any moneys from private persons or private or public agencies to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1969 c 129 s 28.]